Illinois, session 104th, SB3001.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)7    Sec. 2MMMM. Pricing Requirements.8    (a) It is an unlawful practice within the meaning of this 9Act for a business to offer a consumer a different purchase 10price for the same product based solely on whether the 11consumer purchases the product at a physical location operated 12by the business or through a website or mobile application 13operated by the business, if the business maintains:14        (1) a physical location in this State where a consumer 15    may purchase products; and16        (2) a website or mobile application that allows a 17    consumer to purchase a product and pick up the product at a 18    location described in paragraph (1).19    (b) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit 20a business from offering a coupon, discount, promotion, or 21sale for a product if the discounted price is offered on equal 22terms to a consumer who purchases the product at a physical 23location operated by the business and to a consumer who   SB3001- 2 -LRB104 20024 SPS 33475 b1purchases the product through a website or mobile application 2operated by the business.